Louisiana, session 2026, HB23.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:542.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§542.4. Cost-of-living adjustment; payable July 1, 2026
A. Notwithstanding any provision of R.S. 11:542 to the contrary, the board
of trustees of the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System may grant a cost-
of-living adjustment, funded exclusively with money from the experience account
and payable July 1, 2026, to the following retirees and beneficiaries:
(1) Any retiree, other than a disability retiree, who has attained at least age
sixty and who has received a benefit for at least one year by June 30, 2026.
(2) Any nonretiree beneficiary, if benefits had been paid to the retiree or the
beneficiary, or both combined, for at least one year and if the retiree would have
attained age sixty by June 30, 2026.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 23 ENROLLED
(3) Any disability retiree or a person who receives benefits from the system
based on the death of a disability retiree, if benefits have been paid to the retiree or
the beneficiary, or both combined for at least one year by June 30, 2026.
B. The adjustment authorized by this Section shall be payable only on the
first eighty-one thousand two hundred and one dollars of a retiree or beneficiary's
benefit and shall be an amount determined by the system's actuary with the
agreement of the legislative auditor's actuary that is supported by the experience
account balance after any credits or debits to the account pursuant to R.S. 11:542, up
to a maximum payment of two percent of the eligible benefit amount.
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
June 30, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.